Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2611
Nonconformity, defined.

Nonconformity means a condition or defect that substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of an assistive device and that is covered by an express warranty applicable to the assistive device or to a component of the assistive device but does not include (1) a condition or defect that is the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized modification or alteration of the assistive device by a consumer or (2) a condition that is the result of normal use which could be resolved through fitting adjustments, cleaning, or proper care.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 11.